North Dakota, session 69, SB2285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 28-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Judicial deference.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in interpreting or applying a statute, regulation,
or rule, a judge may not defer to an administrative agency's interpretation of the statute,
regulation, or rule.
Page No. 1 25.1100.02000